California statutes. Probate Code
The guardian or conservator may deposit personal property of the estate with a trust company for safekeeping. Unless otherwise provided by court order, the personal property may be withdrawn without order of court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2455.

(a) A trust company serving as guardian or conservator may deposit securities that constitute all or part of the estate in a securities depository as provided in Section 775 of the Financial Code.

(b) If the securities have been deposited with a trust company pursuant to Section 2328 or Section 2454, the trust company may deposit the securities in a securities depository as provided in Section 775 of the Financial Code.

(c) The securities depository may hold securities deposited with it in the manner authorized by Section 775 of the Financial Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2456.

(a) Upon application of the guardian or conservator, the court may, with or without notice, order that money or other personal property be deposited pursuant to Section 2453 or 2454, and be subject to withdrawal only upon authorization of the court.

(b) The guardian or conservator shall deliver a copy of the court order to the financial institution or trust company at the time the deposit is made.

(c) No financial institution or trust company accepting a deposit pursuant to Section 2453 or 2454 is on notice of the existence of an order that the money or other property is subject to withdrawal only upon authorization of the court unless it has actual notice of the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2457.

The guardian or conservator may maintain in good condition and repair the home or other dwelling of either or both of the following:

(a) The ward or conservatee.

(b) The persons legally entitled to such maintenance and repair from the ward or conservatee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2458.

With respect to a share of stock of a domestic or foreign corporation held in the estate, a membership in a nonprofit corporation held in the estate, or other property held in the estate, a guardian or conservator may do any one or more of the following:

(a) Vote in person, and give proxies to exercise, any voting rights with respect to the share, membership, or other property.

(b) Waive notice of a meeting or give consent to the holding of a meeting.

(c) Authorize, ratify, approve, or confirm any action which could be taken by shareholders, members, or property owners.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2459.

(a) The guardian or conservator may obtain, continue, renew, modify, terminate, or otherwise deal in any of the following for the purpose of providing protection to the ward or conservatee or a person legally entitled to support from the ward or conservatee:

(1) Medical, hospital, and other health care policies, plans, or benefits.

(2) Disability policies, plans, or benefits.

(b) The conservator may continue in force any of the following in which the conservatee, or a person legally entitled to support, maintenance, or education from the conservatee, has or will have an interest:

(1) Life insurance policies, plans, or benefits.

(2) Annuity policies, plans, or benefits.

(3) Mutual fund and other dividend reinvestment plans.

(4) Retirement, profit-sharing, and employee welfare plans or benefits.

(c) The right to elect benefit or payment options, to terminate, to change beneficiaries or ownership, to assign rights, to borrow, or to receive cash value in return for a surrender of rights, or to take similar actions under any of the policies, plans, or benefits described in subdivision (b) may be exercised by the conservator only after authorization or direction by order of the court, except as permitted in Section 2544.5. To obtain such an order, the conservator or other interested person shall petition under Article 10 (commencing with Section 2580).

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), unless the court otherwise orders, the conservator without authorization of the court may borrow on the loan value of an insurance policy to pay the current premiums to keep the policy in force if the conservatee followed that practice prior to the establishment of the conservatorship.

(e) The guardian may give the consent provided in Section 10112 of the Insurance Code without authorization of the court, but the guardian may use funds of the guardianship estate to effect or maintain in force a contract entered into by the ward under Section 10112 of the Insurance Code only after authorization by order of the court. To obtain such an order, the guardian, the ward, or any other interested person shall file a petition showing that it is in the best interest of the ward or of the guardianship estate to do so. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(f) Nothing in this section limits the power of the guardian or conservator to make investments as otherwise authorized by this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 86, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2460.

The guardian or conservator may insure:

(a) Property of the estate against loss or damage.

(b) The ward or conservatee, the guardian or conservator, and all or any part of the estate against liability to third persons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2461.

(a) The guardian or conservator may prepare, execute, and file tax returns for the ward or conservatee and for the estate and may exercise options and elections and claim exemptions for the ward or conservatee and for the estate under the applicable tax laws.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 2502, the guardian or conservator may pay, contest, and compromise taxes, penalties, and assessments upon the property of the estate and income and other taxes payable or claimed to be payable by the ward or conservatee or the estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2462.

Subject to Section 2463, unless another person is appointed for that purpose, the guardian or conservator may:

(a) Commence and maintain actions and proceedings for the benefit of the ward or conservatee or the estate.

(b) Defend actions and proceedings against the ward or conservatee, the guardian or conservator, or the estate.

(c) File a petition commencing a case under Title 11 of the United States Code (Bankruptcy) on behalf of the ward or conservatee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2463.

(a) The guardian or conservator may bring an action against the other cotenants for partition of any property in which the ward or conservatee has an undivided interest if the court has first made an order authorizing the guardian or conservator to do so. The court may make the order ex parte on a petition filed by the guardian or conservator.

(b) The guardian or conservator may consent and agree, without an action, to a partition of the property and to the part to be set off to the estate, and may execute deeds or conveyances to the owners of the remaining interests of the parts to which they may be respectively entitled, if the court has made an order
 under Article 5 (commencing with Section 2500) authorizing the guardian or conservator to do so.

(c) If the ward or conservatee, or the guardian or conservator in that capacity, is made a defendant in a partition action, the guardian or conservator may defend the action without authorization of the court.

(d) If the subject property is the conservatee’s present or former personal residence, the powers granted pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section are subject to the requirements of Sections 2352.5, 2540, 2541, and 2541.5, which govern the sale and partition of a conservatee’s personal residence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 91, Sec. 1.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2464.

(a) If it is to the advantage of the estate to accept a deed to property which is subject to a mortgage or deed of trust in lieu of foreclosure of the mortgage or sale under the deed of trust, the guardian or conservator may, after authorization by order of the court and upon such terms and conditions as may be imposed by the court, accept a deed conveying the property to the ward or conservatee.

(b) To obtain an order under this section, the guardian or conservator shall file a petition showing the advantage to the estate of accepting the deed. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(c) The court shall make an order under this section only if the advantage to the estate of accepting the deed is shown by clear and convincing evidence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2465.

The guardian or conservator may dispose of or abandon valueless property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2466.

The guardian or conservator may advance the guardian’s or conservator’s own funds for the benefit of the ward or conservatee or the estate and may reimburse the advance out of the income and principal of the estate first available. With court authorization or approval, interest on the amount advanced may be allowed at the legal rate payable on judgments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2467.

(a) The guardian or conservator continues to have the duty of custody and conservation of the estate after the death of the ward or conservatee pending the delivery thereof to the personal representative of the ward’s or conservatee’s estate or other disposition according to law.

(b) The guardian or conservator has such powers as are granted to a guardian or conservator under this division as are necessary for the performance of the duty imposed by subdivision (a).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2468.

(a) The conservator of the estate of a disabled attorney who was engaged in the practice of law at the time of his or her disability, or other person interested in the estate, may bring a petition seeking the appointment of an active member of the State Bar of California to take control of the files and assets of the practice of the disabled member.

(b) The petition may be filed and heard on such notice that the court determines is in the best interests of the persons interested in the estate of the disabled member. If the petition alleges that the immediate appointment of a practice administrator is required to safeguard the interests of the estate, the court may dispense with notice provided that the conservator is the petitioner or has joined in the petition or has otherwise waived notice of hearing on the petition.

(c) The petition shall indicate the powers sought for the practice administrator from the list of powers set forth in Section 6185 of the Business and Professions Code. These powers shall be specifically listed in the order appointing the practice administrator.

(d) The petition shall allege the value of the assets that are to come under the control of the practice administrator, including but not limited by the amount of funds in all accounts used by the disabled member. The court shall require the filing of a surety bond in the amount of the value of the personal property to be filed with the court by the practice administrator. No action may be taken by the practice administrator unless a bond has been duly filed with the court.

(e) The practice administrator shall not be the attorney representing the conservator.

(f) The court shall appoint the attorney nominated by the disabled member in a writing, including but not limited to the disabled member’s will, unless the court concludes that the appointment of the nominated person would be contrary to the best interests of the estate or would create a conflict of interest with any of the clients of the disabled member.

(g) The practice administrator shall be compensated only upon order of the court making the appointment for his or her reasonable and necessary services. The law practice shall be the source of the compensation for the practice administrator unless the assets are insufficient, in which case, the compensation of the practice administrator shall be charged against the assets of the estate as a cost of administration. The practice administrator shall also be entitled to reimbursement of his or her costs.

(h) Upon conclusion of the services of the practice administrator, the practice administrator shall render an accounting and petition for its approval by the superior court making the appointment. Upon settlement of the accounting, the practice administrator shall be discharged and the surety on his or her bond exonerated.

(i) If the court appointing the practice administrator determines upon petition that the disabled attorney has recovered his or her capacity to resume his or her law practice, the appointment of a practice administrator shall forthwith terminate and the disabled attorney shall be restored to his or her practice.

(j) For purposes of this section, the person appointed to take control of the practice of the disabled member shall be referred to as the “practice administrator” and the conservatee shall be referred to as the “disabled member.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 682, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2469.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2024, when a professional fiduciary becomes incapacitated and a vacancy exists, the incapacitated fiduciary’s conservator, agent under a power of attorney for asset management, trustee, or interested person may petition for the appointment of one or more individuals qualified to act as a professional fiduciary under the Professional Fiduciaries Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code) as a professional fiduciary practice administrator to take control of the incapacitated professional fiduciary’s files and to be appointed as temporary successor as to those matters for which a vacancy exists as a result of the professional fiduciary’s incapacity.

(b) The petition shall request an order appointing a professional fiduciary practice administrator as temporary successor, with all of the powers and duties held by the incapacitated fiduciary, in each matter in which the incapacitated fiduciary was acting in a representative capacity, including guardianships of the estate, conservatorships of the person and the estate, decedent’s estates, court-supervised trusts, and non-court-supervised trusts.

(c) The court shall require the professional fiduciary practice administrator to file a surety bond in each matter in which the professional fiduciary practice administrator is appointed temporary successor, in the amount currently required of the incapacitated fiduciary or in another amount as the court deems appropriate.

(d) The court may appoint as the professional fiduciary practice administrator the professional fiduciary nominated by the incapacitated fiduciary in a writing, including, but not limited to, the incapacitated fiduciary’s will or trust, or in the absence thereof, the person nominated by the person having legal standing to act on behalf of the incapacitated professional fiduciary. The court shall not make the appointment if the court concludes that the appointment of the nominated person would be contrary to the best interests of, or would create a conflict of interest with, any interested party in a matter in which the incapacitated fiduciary was acting in a fiduciary capacity.

(e) The appointment of the professional fiduciary practice administrator as temporary successor shall
 terminate, in each of the matters in which the professional fiduciary practice administrator was appointed as temporary successor, 45 days after the entry of the order appointing the professional fiduciary practice administrator, or earlier if another person is appointed.

(f) Notice of the hearing on the petition for appointment of a professional fiduciary practice administrator as temporary successor shall be given to all persons entitled to notice in each of the matters which are the subject of the petition. The court may dispense with notice if the petition alleges that the immediate appointment of a professional fiduciary practice administrator is required to safeguard the interests of an individual or an asset in a matter in which the incapacitated fiduciary was acting in a representative capacity.

(g) The professional fiduciary practice administrator shall be compensated for services provided and reimbursement of costs incurred in each matter solely from the assets of that matter subject to the provisions of the applicable document or as determined by the court, and in no event more than the incapacitated fiduciary would have been paid.

(h) The professional fiduciary practice administrator appointed in a given matter shall do all of the following:

(1) File a copy of the order appointing the professional fiduciary practice administrator as temporary successor in each of the matters in which the court appoints the professional fiduciary practice administrator as temporary successor.

(2) Take control and review all files and writings maintained by the incapacitated fiduciary for matters in which the incapacitated fiduciary was acting in a representative capacity.

(3) Within 15 days after the entry of the order appointing the professional fiduciary practice administrator as temporary successor, provide written notice to all interested parties as to each matter in which the incapacitated fiduciary was acting in a representative capacity who can be reasonably ascertained and located to inform those parties of the appointment of the professional fiduciary practice administrator as temporary successor. The notice shall advise the interested parties of the necessity and process for the appointment of a permanent successor, which shall include the following:

(A) The right of the parties to petition the court for the appointment of a permanent successor.

(B) The right of any interested party to nominate an individual to act as permanent successor, and then the obligation of the professional fiduciary practice administrator to petition for the appointment of the individual nominated, provided an interested party provides the professional fiduciary practice administrator with the name of their nominee within 15 days after the date notice was given.

(C) The ability of the professional fiduciary practice administrator, in the event none of the interested parties act within the time prescribed, under subparagraph (A) or (B), to petition the court for appointment of a permanent
 successor.

(4) Upon the court’s appointment of a permanent successor, the professional fiduciary practice administrator shall file an account and report on behalf of the incapacitated fiduciary for any period of time the incapacitated fiduciary would have been required to account, as well as for the period of time the professional fiduciary practice administrator served as temporary successor. As part of that account and report, the professional fiduciary practice administrator may request compensation both on behalf of the incapacitated fiduciary, for services rendered prior to their incapacity, and on their own behalf for services rendered after the
 incapacitated fiduciary’s incapacity, as temporary successor, subject to any limitation on fees and costs that existed for the incapacitated fiduciary, and may request discharge and exoneration of bond. The account filed for the period during which the matter was administered by the now incapacitated fiduciary may be verified on information and belief.

(5) Comply with any other obligations imposed by the court.

(i) Each of the time periods prescribed in this section may be extended by the court if the court determines that good cause exists, and if the court determines that the extension is in the best interest of the minor, the conservatee, the decedent’s estate, or the current income beneficiaries under a trust, as applicable.

(j) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Incapacitated” means that the person is unable to fulfill their duties as a professional fiduciary because of either temporary or permanent disability, incapacity, or absence.

(2) “Professional fiduciary practice administrator” means the person or persons appointed pursuant to this section to take over the responsibilities from the incapacitated fiduciary.

(3) “Vacancy” means that the instrument under which the incapacitated fiduciary was acting does not name a successor to fill the vacancy, the instrument under which the incapacitated fiduciary was acting does not provide a nonjudicial method to fill the vacancy, or a cofiduciary, authorized to
 act solely, was not acting with the incapacitated fiduciary.

(k) This section does not limit the authority granted to the court under subdivision (j) of Section 2250, Section 8523, and subdivision (e) of Section 15642.

(l) The Judicial Council shall create or revise any forms or rules necessary to implement this section no later than January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 478, Sec. 58.   (AB 1756)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Compromise of Claims and Actions; Extension, Renewal, or Modification of Obligations [2500. - 2507.]

2500.

(a) Unless this article or some other applicable statute requires court authorization or approval, if it is to the advantage of the estate, the guardian or conservator may do any of the following without court authorization, instruction, approval, or confirmation:

(1) Compromise or settle a claim, action, or proceeding by or for the benefit of, or against, the ward or conservatee, the guardian or conservator, or the estate, including the giving of a covenant not to sue.

(2) Extend, renew, or in any manner modify the terms of an obligation owing to or running in favor of the ward or conservatee or the estate.

(b) Nothing in this section precludes the guardian or conservator from seeking court authorization, instructions, approval, or confirmation pursuant to Section 2403.

(c) Upon petition of the ward or conservatee, a creditor, or any interested person, or upon the court’s own motion, the court may limit the authority of the guardian or conservator under subdivision (a). Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2501.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), court approval is required for a compromise, settlement, extension, renewal, or modification which affects any of the following:

(1) Title to real property.

(2) An interest in real property or a lien or encumbrance on real property.

(3) An option to purchase real property or an interest in real property.

(b) If it is to the advantage of the estate, the guardian or conservator without prior court approval may extend, renew, or modify a lease of real property in either of the following cases:

(1) Where under the lease as extended, renewed, or modified the rental does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) a month and the term does not exceed two years.

(2) Where the lease is from month to month, regardless of the amount of the rental.

(c) For the purposes of subdivision (b), if the lease as extended, renewed, or modified gives the lessee the right to extend the term of the lease, the length of the term shall be considered as though the right to extend had been exercised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 10.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 48 of Ch. 710.)
-------------------------------------------

2502.

Court approval is required for a compromise or settlement of a matter when the transaction requires the transfer or encumbrance of property of the estate, or the creation of an unsecured liability of the estate, or both, in an amount or value in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2503.

Court approval is required for any of the following:

(a) A compromise or settlement of a claim by the ward or conservatee against the guardian or conservator or against the attorney for the guardian or conservator, whether or not the claim arises out of the administration of the estate.

(b) An extension, renewal, or modification of the terms of a debt or similar obligation of the guardian or conservator, or of the attorney for the guardian or conservator, owing to or running in favor of the ward or conservatee or the estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2504.

Court approval is required for the compromise or settlement of any of the following:

(a) A claim for the support, maintenance, or education of (1) the ward or conservatee, or (2) a person whom the ward or conservatee is legally obligated to support, maintain, or educate, against any other person (including, but not limited to, the spouse or parent of the ward or the spouse, domestic partner, parent, or adult child of the conservatee).

(b) A claim of the ward or conservatee for wrongful death.

(c) A claim of the ward or conservatee for physical or nonphysical harm to the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2505.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), where the claim or matter is the subject of a pending action or proceeding, the court approval required by this article shall be obtained from the court in which the action or proceeding is pending.

(b) Where the claim or matter is not the subject of a pending action or proceeding, the court approval required by this article shall be obtained from one of the following:

(1) The court in which the guardianship or conservatorship proceeding is pending.

(2) The superior court of the county where the ward or conservatee or
 guardian or conservator resides at the time the petition for approval is filed.

(3) The superior court of any county where a suit on the claim or matter properly could be brought.

(c) Where the claim or matter is the subject of a pending action or proceeding that is not brought in a court of this state, court approval required by this article shall be obtained from either of the following:

(1) The court in which the action or proceeding is pending.

(2) The court in which the guardianship or conservatorship proceeding is pending.

(d) (1) Subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) do not apply to a conservatorship that is registered in this state pursuant to Article 4 (commencing
 with Section 2011) of Chapter 8 of Part 3.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), when a conservatorship is registered in this state pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 2011) of Chapter 8 of Part 3, the court approval required by this article shall be obtained in accordance with Section 2016.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 2016, when a conservatorship is registered in this state pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 2011) of Chapter 8 of Part 3, and the claim or matter in question is the subject of a pending action or proceeding that is not brought in a court of this state, the court approval required by this article may be obtained from the court in which the action or proceeding is pending.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 25.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2506.

Where approval of the court in which the guardianship or conservatorship proceeding is pending is required under this article, the guardian or conservator shall file a petition with the court showing the advantage of the compromise, settlement, extension, renewal, or modification to the ward or conservatee and the estate. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2507.

Notwithstanding Sections 2500 to 2506, inclusive:

(a) Whenever another statute requires, provides a procedure for, or dispenses with court approval of a compromise, settlement, extension, renewal, or modification, the provisions of that statute govern any case to which that statute applies.

(b) Whenever another statute provides that a compromise or settlement of an administrative proceeding is not valid unless approved in such proceeding, the approval is governed by that statute, and approval in the guardianship or conservatorship proceeding is not required.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Sales [2540. - 2548.]

2540.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 2544 and 2545, and except for the sale of a conservatee’s present or former personal residence as set forth in subdivision (b), sales of real or personal property of the estate under this article are subject to authorization, confirmation, or direction of the court, as provided in this article.

(b) In seeking authorization to sell a conservatee’s present or former personal residence, consent and agree to partition of a conservatee’s present or former personal residence, or bring an action for partition of a conservatee’s present or former personal residence, the conservator shall notify the court that the present or former personal
 residence is proposed to be sold or partitioned and that the conservator has discussed the proposed sale or partition with the conservatee. The conservator shall inform the court whether the conservatee supports or is opposed to the proposed sale or partition and shall describe the circumstances that necessitate the proposed sale or partition, including whether the conservatee has the ability to live in the personal residence and why other alternatives, including, but not limited to, in-home care services, are not available. The court, in its discretion, may require the court investigator to discuss the proposed sale or partition with the conservatee.

(c) Notice under subdivision (b) shall be provided to the court before the conservator commits any significant resources to the proposed sale or partition of the residence, unless the
 conservator can establish that either the conservatee has the capacity to consent and unequivocally consents to the sale or partition, or there are exigent circumstances that require the conservator to commit resources to the sale or partition prior to court approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 91, Sec. 2.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2541.

The guardian or conservator may sell real or personal property of the estate, consent and agree to partition of real or personal property of the estate, or bring an action for partition of real or personal property of the estate, in any of the following cases:

(a) If the income of the estate is insufficient for the comfortable and suitable support, maintenance, and education of the ward or conservatee (including care, treatment, and support of the ward or conservatee if a patient in a state hospital under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services) or of those legally entitled to support, maintenance, or education from the ward or
 conservatee.

(b) If the sale or partition is necessary to pay the debts referred to in Sections 2430 and 2431.

(c) If the sale or partition is for the advantage, benefit, and best interest of (1) the ward or conservatee, (2) the estate, or (3) the ward or conservatee and those legally entitled to support, maintenance, or education from the ward or conservatee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 91, Sec. 3.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2541.5.

Notwithstanding Section 2541, the court may authorize a conservator to sell a conservatee’s present or former personal residence, consent and agree to partition of a conservatee’s present or former personal residence, or bring an action for partition of a conservatee’s present or former personal residence, only if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the conservator demonstrated a compelling need to sell or partition the personal residence for the benefit of the
 conservatee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 91, Sec. 4.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2542.

(a) All sales shall be for cash or for part cash and part deferred payments. Except as otherwise provided in Sections 2544 and 2545, the terms of sale are subject to the approval of the court.

(b) If real property is sold for part deferred payments, the guardian or conservator shall take the note of the purchaser for the unpaid portion of the purchase money, with a mortgage or deed of trust on the property to secure payment of the note. The mortgage or deed of trust shall be subject only to encumbrances existing at the date of sale and such other encumbrances as the court may approve.

(c) If real or personal property of the estate sold for part deferred payments consists of an undivided interest, a joint tenancy interest, or any other interest less than the entire ownership, and the owner or owners of the remaining interests in the property join in the sale, the note and deed of trust or mortgage may be made to the ward or conservatee and the other owner or owners.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2543.

(a) If estate property is required or permitted to be sold, the guardian or conservator may:

(1) Use discretion as to which property to sell first.

(2) Sell the entire interest of the estate in the property or any lesser interest therein.

(3) Sell the property either at public auction or private sale.

(b) Subject to Section 1469, unless otherwise specifically provided in this article, all proceedings concerning sales by guardians or conservators, publishing and posting notice of sale, reappraisal for sale, minimum offer price for the property, reselling the property, report of sale and petition for confirmation of sale, and notice and hearing of that petition, making orders authorizing sales, rejecting or confirming sales and reports of sales, ordering and making conveyances of property sold, and allowance of commissions, shall conform, as nearly as may be, to the provisions of this code concerning sales by a personal representative, including, but not limited to, Articles 6 (commencing with Section 10300), 7 (commencing with Section 10350), 8 (commencing with Section 10360), and 9 (commencing with Section 10380) of Chapter 18 of Part 5 of Division 7. The provisions concerning sales by a personal representative as described in the Independent Administration of Estates Act, Part 6 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 7 shall not apply to this subdivision.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 10309, if the last appraisal of the conservatee’s personal residence was conducted more than six months prior to the confirmation hearing, a new appraisal shall be required prior to the confirmation hearing, unless the court finds that it is in the best interests of the conservatee to rely on an appraisal of the personal residence that was conducted not more than one year prior to the confirmation hearing.

(d) The clerk of the court shall cause notice to be posted pursuant to subdivision (b) only in the following cases:

(1) If posting of notice of hearing is required on a petition for the confirmation of a sale of real or personal property of the estate.

(2) If posting of notice of a sale governed by Section 10250 (sales of personal property) is required or authorized.

(3) If posting of notice is ordered by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 553, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2544.

(a) Except as specifically limited by order of the court, subject to Section 2541, the guardian or conservator may sell securities without authorization, confirmation, or direction of the court if any of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The securities are to be sold on an established stock or bond exchange.

(2) The securities to be sold are securities designated as a national market system security on an interdealer quotation system or subsystem thereof, by the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc., sold through a broker-dealer registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the regular course of business of the broker-dealer.

(3) The securities are to be directly redeemed by the issuer thereof.

(b) Section 2543 does not apply to sales under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 86, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2544.5.

Except as specifically limited by the court, subject to Section 2541, the guardian or conservator may sell mutual funds held without designation of a beneficiary without authorization, confirmation, or direction of the court. Section 2543 does not apply to sales under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 86, Sec. 2.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2545.

(a) Subject to subdivisions (b) and (c) and to Section 2541, the guardian or conservator may sell or exchange tangible personal property of the estate without authorization, confirmation, or direction of the court.

(b) The aggregate of the sales or exchanges made during any calendar year under this section may not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(c) A sale or exchange of personal effects or of furniture or furnishings used for personal, family, or household purposes may be made under this section only if:

(1) In the case of a guardianship, the ward is under the age of 14 or, if 14 years of age or over, consents to the sale or exchange.

(2) In the case of a conservatorship, the conservatee either (i) consents to the sale or exchange or (ii) the conservatee does not have legal capacity to give such consent.

(d) Failure of the guardian or conservator to observe the limitations of subdivision (b) or (c) does not invalidate the title of, or impose any liability upon, a third person who acts in good faith and without actual notice of the lack of authority of the guardian or conservator.

(e) Subdivision (b) of Section 2543 does not apply to sales under this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2547.

The guardian or conservator shall apply the proceeds of the sale to the purposes for which it was made, as far as necessary, and the residue, if any, shall be managed as the other property of the estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2548.
